Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1225.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 25, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-3337, to read: START_STATUTE20-3337. Pharmacy benefit managers; third-party payors; cost sharing requirement; prescription drugs A. A pharmacy benefit manager or a third-party payor shall require that a covered individual's cost sharing requirement for a prescription drug be calculated at the point of sale based on a price that is reduced by an amount equal to at least one hundred percent of all rebates that are received by the pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payor for the prescription drug. B. A pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payor may not retain any portion of a rebate or other price concession as a source of revenue. C. This section does not prevent a pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payor from decreasing a covered individual's cost sharing requirement by an amount greater than what is required in subsection A of this section. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Cost sharing requirement" means any copayment, coinsurance, deductible or other covered individual obligation for a covered prescription drug. 2. "covered individual" means an insured, enrollee or subscriber who is eligible to receive benefits through a health care plan as defined in section 20-3335. 3. "Rebate" means: (a) Negotiated price concessions, including base price concessions and reasonable estimates or any price protection rebates and performance-based rebates, that may accrue directly or indirectly to the pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payor during the coverage year from a manufacturer, dispensing pharmacy or other party in connection with dispensing the prescription drug. (b) Administration fees and other payments that are collected by the pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payor from a manufacturer. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Applicability This act applies to subscription contracts, policies and evidences of coverage that are entered into, renewed, extended or modified from and after December 31, 2026.